Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1609
Discontinuance of service; dispute; statement; effect.

A domestic subscriber may dispute the proposed discontinuance of water, natural gas, or electricity by notifying the utility with a written statement that sets forth the reasons for the dispute and the relief requested. If a statement has been made by the subscriber, a conference shall be held before the utility may discontinue service.

Laws 1979, LB 143, § 7;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 19-2708;

Laws 1988, LB 792, § 9.